raw/lt-LT_raw.aff
FLAG num
SFX 15037 o ančiosios .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 o ančiųjų .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 o ančiosioms .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 o ančiosiom .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 o ančiąsias .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 o ančiosiomis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 o ančiosiom .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 o ančiosiose .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 o ančiosios .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i intis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i įs [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom_short
SFX 15037 i inčio [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiam [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i intį [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiu [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiame [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiam [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i įs [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Voc_short
SFX 15037 i intys [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i į [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom_short
SFX 15037 i į [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Neut
SFX 15037 i inčių [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i intiems [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i intiem [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčius [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiais [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiuose [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiuos [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intys [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i į [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Voc_short
SFX 15037 i inti [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiai [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčią [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčia [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčioje [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčioj [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i inti [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i į [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom_short_rare
SFX 15037 i inčių [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčioms [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiom [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčias [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiomis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiom [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 i inčiose [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i į [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Voc_short_rare
SFX 15037 i intysis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i intysai [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
SFX 15037 i inčiojo [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiajam [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i intįjį [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiuoju [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiajame [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiajam [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intysis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i intysai [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
SFX 15037 i intieji [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiųjų [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i intiesiems [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i intiesiem [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčiuosius [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiaisiais [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiuosiuose [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiuosiuos [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intieji [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčioji [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiajai [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiąją [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiąja [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiojoje [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiojoj [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i inčioji [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiųjų [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiosioms [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiosiom [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčiąsias [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiosiomis [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiosiom [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 i inčiosiose [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^s]i	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i intis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i įs [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom_short
SFX 15037 i inčio [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiam [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i intį [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiu [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiame [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiam [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i įs [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Voc_short
SFX 15037 i intys [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i į [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom_short
SFX 15037 i į [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Neut
SFX 15037 i inčių [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i intiems [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i intiem [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčius [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiais [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiuose [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiuos [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intys [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i į [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Voc_short
SFX 15037 i inti [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiai [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčią [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčia [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčioje [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčioj [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i inti [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i į [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom_short_rare
SFX 15037 i inčių [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčioms [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiom [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčias [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiomis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiom [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 i inčiose [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i į [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Voc_short_rare
SFX 15037 i intysis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i intysai [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
SFX 15037 i inčiojo [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiajam [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i intįjį [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiuoju [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiajame [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiajam [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intysis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i intysai [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
SFX 15037 i intieji [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiųjų [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i intiesiems [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i intiesiem [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčiuosius [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiaisiais [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiuosiuose [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiuosiuos [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i intieji [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčioji [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiajai [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiąją [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiąja [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiojoje [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiojoj [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 i inčioji [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 i inčiųjų [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 i inčiosioms [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 i inčiosiom [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 i inčiąsias [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 i inčiosiomis [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 i inčiosiom [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 i inčiosiose [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 i inčiosios [^aio]si	is:Part_Act_Pres_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 asi ąsis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 isi įsis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 osi ąsis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 asi ąsi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 isi įsi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 osi ąsi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 asi antis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 isi intis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 osi antis .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 asi ančiosi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 isi inčiosi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 osi ančiosi .	is:Part_Act_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 0 mas [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 0 mo [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 0 mam [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 0 mą [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 0 mu [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 0 mame [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 0 mam [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 0 mas [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 0 mi [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 0 mų [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 0 miems [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 0 miem [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 0 mus [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 0 mais [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 0 muose [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 15037 0 muos [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 15037 0 mi [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Masc_Pl_Voc
SFX 15037 0 ma [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Neut
SFX 15037 0 ma [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 15037 0 mos [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 15037 0 mai [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 15037 0 mą [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 15037 0 ma [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 15037 0 moje [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 15037 0 moj [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 15037 0 ma [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Sg_Voc
SFX 15037 0 mos [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 15037 0 mų [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 15037 0 moms [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 15037 0 mom [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 15037 0 mas [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 15037 0 momis [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 15037 0 mom [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 15037 0 mose [ao]	is:Part_Pass_Pres_Fem_Pl_Loc
